District of Columbia statutes.
16-3543

Proceedings on default.

If the defendant does not appear as required by a writ of quo warranto, after being served, the court may proceed to hear proof in support of the writ and render judgment accordingly.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 603, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3543.
1973 Ed., § 16-3543.